District of Columbia statutes.
44-1002.03

Petitions for receivership.

(a)

Notwithstanding the availability of any other remedy, the Attorney General for the District of Columbia may, in the name of the District and based on one or more of the grounds listed in § 44-1002.02, petition the court to appoint a receiver for any facility.

(b)

Notwithstanding the availability of any other remedy, a resident, a resident’s representative, the Long-Term Care Ombudsman, or any other advocate representing the interests of a facility’s residents may, based on one or more of the grounds listed in § 44-1002.02(2) through (6), submit a written request asking the Attorney General for the District of Columbia to petition the court to appoint a receiver for any facility. If the Attorney General for the District of Columbia denies the request or does not file a petition within 5 days (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays) after receiving a request, the requestor may file with the court a petition for the appointment of a receiver.

(c)

The licensee of any facility may, based on one or more of the grounds listed in § 44-1002.02, petition the court to appoint a voluntary receiver for that facility.

History

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 203, 33 DCR 1510
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 67, 52 DCR 2638

Section References

This section is referenced in § 44-1002.04, § 44-1002.05, § 44-1002.07, and § 44-1002.10.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1413.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.